Hawaii statutes.
[§302H-7]
Collaboration. The department
of education shall work collaboratively with the Hawaiian language college of
the University of Hawaii at Hilo and any other entities recognized by the
legislature for the purpose of addressing Hawaiian language medium education,
extending to those entities support for inclusion in the special provisions for
children and families enrolled in the Hawaiian language medium education
program of the department and maximizing the joint use of existing and new
resources to meet the goal of revitalizing, maintaining, and strengthening the
Hawaiian language. [L 2004, c 133, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next